Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 9. Distribution and Power Supply Cooperatives.

§§ 56-209 through 56-231.14.

Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 874.

Cross references.

As to present utility cooperative provisions, see § 56-231.15 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Section 56-210 was amended by Acts 1999, c. 415. This amendment is reflected in the comparable new section, § 56-231.16, enacted by Acts 1999, c. 874.

Section 56-224.2, which was enacted by Acts 1999, cc. 939, 940, has been codified at § 56-231.31:1, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.